Vermont, session 2025-2026, S253.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 563 is amended to read:
§ 563. POWERS OF SCHOOL BOARDS; FORM OF VOTE
The school board of a school district, in addition to other duties and
authority specifically assigned by law:
* * *
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 2 of 12
(11)(A) Shall prepare and distribute annually a proposed budget for the
next school year according to such major categories as may from time to time
be prescribed by the Secretary.
(B) In addition to the information required in subdivision (C) of this
subdivision (11), any proposed budget shall show the following information if
the school district pays tuition for one or more students to attend a public
school, approved independent school, or therapeutic approved independent
school:
(i) name of school or schools receiving tuition from the district;
(ii) number of students attending each school; and
(iii) total tuition paid to each school.
* * *
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 166 is amended to read:
§ 166. APPROVED AND RECOGNIZED INDEPENDENT SCHOOLS
(a) Authority. An independent school may operate and provide elementary
education or secondary education if it is either approved or recognized as set
forth in this section.
(b) Approved independent schools. On application, the State Board shall
approve an independent school that offers elementary or secondary education
if it finds, after opportunity for hearing, that the school provides a minimum
course of study pursuant to section 906 of this title and that it substantially
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 3 of 12
complies with all statutory requirements for approved independent schools and
the Board’s rules for approved independent schools. An independent school
that intends to accept public tuition shall be approved by the State Board only
on the condition that the school agrees, notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, to enroll any student who requires special education services
and who is placed in or referred to the approved independent school as an
appropriate placement and least restrictive environment for the student by the
student’s individualized education program team or by the local education
agency; provided, however, that this requirement shall not apply to an
independent school that limits enrollment to students who are on an
individualized education program or a plan under Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and who are enrolled pursuant to
a written agreement between the local education agency and the school. Except
as provided in subdivision (6) of this subsection, the Board’s rules must at
minimum require that the school have the resources required to meet its stated
objectives, including financial capacity, faculty who are qualified by training
and experience in the areas in which they are assigned, and physical facilities
and special services that are in accordance with any State or federal law or
regulation. Approval may be granted without State Board evaluation in the
case of any school accredited by a private, State, or regional agency recognized
by the State Board for accrediting purposes, provided that the State Board shall
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 4 of 12
determine that the school complies with all student enrollment provisions
required by law.
(1) On application, the State Board shall approve an independent school
that offers kindergarten but no other graded education if it finds, after
opportunity for hearing, that the school substantially complies with the Board’s
rules for approved independent kindergartens. The State Board may delegate
to another State agency the authority to evaluate the safety and adequacy of the
buildings in which kindergartens are conducted but shall consider all findings
and recommendations of any such agency in making its approval decision.
(2) Approvals under this subsection (b) shall be for a term established
by rule of the Board but not greater than five years.
(3) An approved independent school shall provide to the parent or
guardian responsible for each of its students, prior to accepting any money for
a student, an accurate statement in writing of its status under this section and a
copy of this section. Failure to comply with this provision may create a
permissible inference of false advertising in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 2005.
(4) Each approved independent school shall provide to the Secretary on
October 1 of each year the names, genders, dates of birth, and addresses of its
enrolled students. Within seven days of after the termination of a student’s
enrollment, the approved independent school shall notify the Secretary of the
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 5 of 12
name and address of the student. The Secretary shall notify the appropriate
school officials as provided in section 1126 of this title.
(5) The State Board may revoke, suspend, or impose conditions upon
the approval of an approved independent school, after having provided an
opportunity for a hearing, for substantial failure to comply with the minimum
course of study, for failure to demonstrate that the school has the resources
required to meet its stated objectives, for failure to comply with statutory
requirements or the Board’s rules for approved independent schools, or for
failure to report under subdivision (4) of this subsection (b). Upon that
revocation or suspension, students required to attend school who are enrolled
in that school shall become truant unless they enroll in a public school, an
approved or recognized independent school, or a home study program.
(6) This subdivision applies to an independent school located in
Vermont that offers a distance learning program and that, because of its
structure, does not meet some or all the rules of the State Board for approved
independent schools. In order to be approved under this subdivision, a school
shall meet the standards adopted by rule of the State Board for approved
independent schools that can be applied to the applicant school and any other
standards or rules adopted by the State Board regarding these types of schools.
A school approved under this subdivision shall not be eligible to receive tuition
payments from public school districts under chapter 21 of this title.
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 6 of 12
(7) Approval for independent residential schools under this subsection is
also contingent upon proof of the school’s satisfactory completion of an annual
fire safety inspection by the Department of Public Safety or its designee
pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 173, subchapter 2. A certificate executed by the
inspecting entity, declaring satisfactory completion of the inspection and
identifying the date by which a new inspection must occur, shall be posted at
the school in a public location. The school shall provide a copy of the
certificate to the Secretary of Education after each annual inspection. The
school shall pay the actual cost of the inspection unless waived or reduced by
the inspecting entity.
(8)(A) If an approved independent school experiences any of the
following financial reporting events during the period of its approved status,
the school shall notify the Secretary of Education within five days after its
knowledge of the event unless the failure is de minimis:
(i) the school’s failure to file its federal or State tax returns when
due, after permissible extension periods have been taken into account;
(ii) the school’s failure to meet its payroll obligations as they are
due or to pay federal or State payroll tax obligations as they are due;
(iii) the school’s failure to maintain required retirement
contributions;
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 7 of 12
(iv) the school’s use of designated funds for nondesignated
purposes;
(v) the school’s inability to fully comply with the financial terms
of its secured installment debt obligations over a period of two consecutive
months, including the school’s failure to make interest or principal payments
as they are due or to maintain any required financial ratios;
(vi) the withdrawal or conditioning of the school’s accreditation
on financial grounds by a private, State, or regional agency recognized by the
State Board for accrediting purposes; or
(vii) the school’s insolvency, as defined in 9 V.S.A. § 2286(a).
(B)(i) If the Secretary reasonably believes that an approved
independent school lacks financial capacity to meet its stated objectives during
the period of its approved status, then the Secretary shall notify the school in
writing of the reasons for this belief and permit the school a reasonable
opportunity to respond.
(ii) If the Secretary, after having provided the school a reasonable
opportunity to respond, does not find that the school has satisfactorily
responded or demonstrated its financial capacity, the Secretary may establish a
review team that, with the consent of the school, includes a member of the
Council of Independent Schools, to:
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 8 of 12
(I) conduct a school visit to assess the school’s financial
capacity;
(II) obtain from the school such financial documentation as the
review team requires to perform its assessment; and
(III) submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
State Board.
(iii) If the State Board concludes that an approved independent
school lacks financial capacity to meet its stated objectives during the period of
its approved status, the State Board may take any action that is authorized by
this section.
(iv) In considering whether an independent school lacks financial
capacity to meet its stated objectives during the period of its approved status
and what actions the State Board should take if it makes this finding, the State
Board may consult with, and draw on the analytical resources of, the Vermont
Department of Financial Regulation.
(C) Information provided by an independent school under this
subsection that is not already in the public domain is exempt from public
inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be kept
confidential.
(9)(A) An approved independent school that intends to accept public
tuition shall be approved by the State Board as eligible to receive public tuition
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 9 of 12
only on the condition that the school complies with the following
requirements; provided, however, that this subdivision (9) shall not apply to
therapeutic approved independent schools as defined in subsection 828(d) of
this title:
(i) the school agrees, notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, to enroll any student who requires special education services and who
is placed in or referred to the approved independent school as an appropriate
placement and least restrictive environment for the student by the student’s
individualized education program team or by the local education agency;
(ii) the school shall provide local education agencies with a report
of any enrollment change for students attending the school on public tuition,
including withdrawals, suspensions, or expulsions, provided that the school
shall notify a local education agency the same school day if the school is
considering expelling a publicly tuitioned student;
(iii) the school shall not use an admissions process for publicly
tuitioned students that includes mandatory interviews, academic entrance
exams, academic history, mandatory campus visits, or consideration of ability
to pay for any costs or fees, provided that:
(I) the school may request proof of a student’s most recently
completed grade;
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 10 of 12
(II) the school may set a capacity limit on the number of
publicly tuitioned students the school will accept; and
(III) the school shall establish a nondiscriminatory selection
process when the number of publicly tuitioned student applicants exceeds any
capacity limits;
(iv) the school shall provide the results of all State-mandated
assessments of students on public tuition to the Agency of Education, which
shall publish the results on its website in a manner consistent with the
publication of the same results for public school students;
(v) publicly tuitioned students shall not be charged an application
fee, an academic fee, any other fees for academic materials, or any tuition
beyond the tuition paid for by the student’s district of residence pursuant to
chapter 21 of this title;
(vi) the school shall make its budget publicly accessible; and
(vii) the school shall comply with the reporting requirement under
subsection 4010(c) of this title and shall provide the applicable weighting
category information for its publicly tuitioned students to the Agency of
Education at the same time it provides this information to the sending school
district.
(B) No private right of action is created by this subdivision (9)
against an approved independent school approved by the State Board as
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 11 of 12
eligible to receive public tuition for failure to comply with any of the
requirements in this subdivision (9). The State Board is authorized to use its
powers under subdivision (5) of this subsection (b) to revoke, suspend, or
impose conditions on the eligibility of an approved independent school to
receive public tuition for failure to comply with these requirements.
Complaints of noncompliance shall be received, investigated, and resolved in
accordance with subdivision (5) of this subsection (b) and State Board of
Education rules. A person shall not coerce, threaten, interfere with, or
otherwise discriminate against any individual who alleges noncompliance with
the requirements under this subdivision (9).
* * *
(e) Harassment, hazing, and bullying policies. The board of trustees of an
approved or recognized independent school operating in Vermont shall adopt
harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention policies; establish procedures for
dealing with harassment, hazing, and bullying of students; and provide notice
of these. The provisions of chapter 9, subchapter 5 of this title for public
schools shall apply to this subsection, except that the board shall follow its
own procedures for adopting policy.
(f) Tuition bills. An approved independent school that accepts students for
whom the district of residence pays tuition under chapter 21 of this title shall
bill the sending district monthly for a State-placed student and shall not bill the
VT LEG #385893 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.253
2026 Page 12 of 12
sending district for any month in which the State-placed student was not
enrolled.
(g) Tuition students; assessments. An approved independent school that
accepts students for whom the district of residence pays tuition under chapter
21 of this title shall use the assessment or assessments required under
subdivision 164(9) of this title to measure attainment of standards for student
performance of those students. In addition, the school shall provide data
related to the assessment or assessments as required by the Secretary.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385893 v.1